Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. In General

§ 31-8-101.
Issuance to residents by department; restrictions; limited to one state-issued credential; digital identification card; definitions; rulemaking.

Any Wyoming resident may be issued an identification card by the department of transportation if the resident does not possess or surrenders any other state-issued, REAL ID Act or other applicable federal law compliant driver’s license or identification card. The application shall state the registrant’s full legal name, social security number, date of birth and any other identifying data the department may require and shall be signed and verified by the applicant. The identification card shall at the applicant’s request indicate that the applicant is an anatomical organ donor as provided by W.S.

35-5-205

or that the applicant has a medical alert designation as provided for in W.S.

31-7-142

. Before receiving an identification card under this chapter a person who previously has been licensed or issued an identification card in this or any other state but who does not have the credential in their possession shall complete an affidavit of “No License/ID Card in Possession.”

The department shall not issue an identification card until documentary evidence of the applicant’s age and identity has been verified using documents as provided by W.S.

31-7-111

.

An identification card issued under subsection (a) of this section may include a digital identification card. A digital identification card may be issued upon request of a registrant and payment of the required fee. No digital identification card shall be issued unless the applicant holds the corresponding physical identification card or unless the corresponding physical identification card is issued simultaneously. A registrant may display a digital identification card by providing access to the digital identification card on the registrant’s portable electronic device. No law enforcement or judicial officer demanding display of a registrant’s digital identification card for any identification verification purpose shall take custody of the registrant’s portable electronic device. Display of a digital identification card shall not serve as consent to search the registrant’s portable electronic device. A digital identification card shall be designed in accordance with W.S. 31-7-115(d)(i) and (ii). Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a person, other than the department if it has chosen to issue a digital identification card, to accept a digital identification card or otherwise require the purchase of equipment to verify the accuracy of a digital identification card.

As used in this chapter:

“Digital identification card” means a secure, electronic representation of a physical identification card that is stored on the registrant’s portable electronic device and may be viewed or verified by a person to whom access is allowed. A digital identification card is optional to purchase, supplemental to a physical identification card and may be accepted in lieu of a physical identification card at the option of the person requesting or requiring proof of identification;

“Portable electronic device” means as defined in W.S. 31-7-102(a)(li);

“REAL ID Act” means the REAL ID Act of 2005, Public Law 109-13, 119 Stat. 302, enacted May 11, 2005, and subsequent amendments thereto.

The department may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 9, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-276.15; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.38; Laws 1977, ch. 114, § 2; 1983, ch. 33, § 1; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1990, ch. 18, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1998, ch. 91, § 1; 2003, ch. 79, § 2; 2009, ch. 35, § 1; ch. 97, § 2; 2019 ch. 139, § 2, effective January 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to validity of tribal identification cards, see §

8-7-101

.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by ch. 35, § 1, effective January 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “registrant's full legal name, social security number, date of birth” for “legal name, correct age”, and “W.S.

35-5-205

” for “W.S. 35-5-112”; substituted “verified using documents as provided by W.S.

31-7-111

” for “received” in (b).

The second 2009 amendment, by ch. 97, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, in (a) substituted “W.S.

35-5-205

” for W.S. 35-5-112.”

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, added “or that the applicant has a medical alert designation as provided for in W.S.

31-7-142

” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a), added “if the resident does not possess or surrenders any other state-issued, REAL ID Act or other applicable federal law compliant driver’s license or identification card” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence; and added (c) through (e).

§ 31-8-102.
Contents.

The identification card or digital identification card shall resemble a Wyoming driver’s license or digital driver’s license. It shall have:

A distinguishing number assigned to the registrant;

His full legal name;

His date of birth;

His resident address;

A brief description including sex, height and weight;

The registrant’s full facial digital color photograph;

The following: “State of Wyoming” — “Identification Card No. . . . . . ” — “This card is provided solely for the purpose of identification of the person described on the card;

The designations as provided for in W.S.

31-7-139

,

31-7-141

and

31-7-142

; and

The registrant’s usual signature unless the registrant is unable to make a signature.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 9, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-276.16; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.39; Laws 1983, ch. 33, § 1; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 2000, ch. 83, § 1; 2009, ch. 35, § 1; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, substituted “full facial digital color photograph” for “picture” in (a)(vi); added (a)(ix); and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a) added “or digital identification card” following “The identification card” and added “or digital driver’s license” following “Wyoming driver’s license.”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(viii) added “The designations” at the beginning and substituted “W.S.

31-7-139

,

31-7-141

and

31-7-142

” for “W.S.

31-7-139

.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-8-103.
Expiration; records; new cards.

Identification cards shall expire on the registrant’s birthday in the eighth year following issuance of the identification card. The department shall keep records of data contained in identification cards.

If an identification card is lost, destroyed or mutilated, the person to whom it was issued may obtain a new identification card upon furnishing the same documentary evidence as for an original identification card.

If any information contained in the identification card becomes inaccurate, or if it is desired to withdraw or insert notice of anatomical organ donation or a medical alert designation, the person to whom it was issued may obtain a new card upon:

Advising the department of his desire to withdraw or insert notice of an anatomical organ donation or a medical alert designation or furnishing proof of the inaccuracies to the department;

Furnishing all documentary evidence necessary to verify any material change to information listed on the original identification card; and

Surrendering the original identification card.

The division shall send a notification for an identification card to the last known address of every eligible registrant, or notify by electronic means if the eligible registrant has consented to receive notices electronically, within one hundred twenty (120) days prior to expiration of the registrant’s identification card. The notification shall conspicuously advise registrants of the requirement that in person voters present acceptable identification immediately before voting at the polling place or absentee polling place and that an identification card is a form of acceptable identification. Every identification card is renewable upon application and payment of the required fee. As used in this section, “last known address” means the address, email address or other electronic contact information, as applicable according to the sending method, on file with the division.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 9, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-276.17; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.40; Laws 1977, ch. 114, § 2; 1983, ch. 33, § 1; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 2009, ch. 35, § 1; 2019 ch. 139, § 2, effective January 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, substituted “expire on the registrant's birthday in the eighth year following issuance of the identification card” for “not expire” in (a); substituted “all documentary evidence necessary to verify any material change to information listed on the” for “the same documentary evidence as for an” in (c)(ii); and added (d).

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, in the introductory language in (c) and (c)(i), added “or a medical alert designation” following “organ donation.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (d), substituted “a notification” for “an application” following “The division shall send,” added “, or notify by electronic means if the eligible registrant has consented to receive notices electronically,” preceding “within one hundred twenty (120) days,” and added the last sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added the second sentence in (d).

§ 31-8-104.
Fees.

Every applicant for an identification card shall pay ten dollars ($10.00) to the department plus an additional ten dollars ($10.00) for a digital identification card if applicable. This fee shall be waived if the applicant requests an identification card that shall be used only for voter identification purposes. The state treasurer shall credit identification card fees to the highway fund. Identification cards, including digital identification cards, issued as a result of the cancellation of a license under W.S. 31-7-122(a)(i) shall be issued without payment of any fee.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 9, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-276.18; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.41; Laws 1983, ch. 33, § 1; 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 1993, ch. 136, § 1; 2009, ch. 35, § 1; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, added the last sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added “plus an additional ten dollars ($10.00) for a digital identification card if applicable” in the first sentence and added “, including digital identification cards,” following “Identification cards” in the third sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added the second sentence.

§ 31-8-105.
Prohibited acts; penalties.

No person shall:

Possess any cancelled, fictitious, fraudulently altered or fraudulently obtained identification card;

Lend his identification card to any other person or knowingly permit its use by another;

Display or represent any identification card not issued to him as being his card;

Photograph, photostat, duplicate or in any way reproduce any identification card or facsimile thereof in such a manner that it could be mistaken for a valid identification card. Possession and display of a digital identification card shall not be considered a violation of this section;

Procure an identification card by false swearing, fraud or false statement of any kind or in any form.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), by imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 9, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 31-276.19; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 31-276.42; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(iv) added the last sentence.